District of Columbia statutes.
2-311.03

Repealed

District of Columbia Supply Schedule and Purchase Card Fund.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1103
as added Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 802, 50 DCR 5668
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1181, 57 DCR 181
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 802 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 802 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1181 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1181 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Short title of title VIII of Law 15-39: Section 801 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that title VIII of the act may be cited as the District of Columbia Supply Schedule Sales Discount and Operating Fund Amendment Act of 2003.

Short title: Section 1180 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle S of title I of the act may be cited as the “District of Columbia Supply Schedule and Purchase Card Fund Amendment Act of 2009”.